Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.904

Actions of telecommunications oversight and policy committee—Savings—1999 c 285.

Actions of the telecommunications oversight and policy committee in effect on June 30, 1999, shall remain in effect thereafter unless modified or repealed by the *K-20 board.

[ 1999 c 285 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.105.800, which created the K-20 board, was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 63.